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DTC B11 83/22 Short in D Squib (2nd step) Circuit
(to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The D squib (2nd step)circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly, the spiral cable and the steering wheel
pad.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS−3.
DTC B11 83/22 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the D squib (2nd step) circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B11 83/22

S Short in D squib (2nd step) circuit (to B+)
S D squib (2nd step) malfunction
S Spiral cable malfunction
S Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

S Steering wheel pad (D squib (2nd step))
S Spiral cable
S Airbag sensor assembly
S Dash wire
S Column wire

HINT:
DTC B11 83/22 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag and without the side airbag
(dual stage airbag).

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−719.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI−764).
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2 Check D squib (2nd step) circuit.

PREPARATION:
Connect thenegative ( −) terminal cable to thebatteryandwait
at least for2seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D2+

of the black connector on the steering wheel pad (D squib
(2nd step)) side between the airbag sensor assembly and
the steering wheel pad (D squib (2nd step)).

OK:
Voltage:Below 1 V

NG Go to step 5.

OK
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3 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(b) Using a service wire, connect D2+ and D2− of the black

connector on the steering wheel pad (D squib (2nd step))
side between the airbag sensor assembly and the steer-
ing wheel pad (D squib (2nd step)).

(c) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB 1183/22 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB 1183/22maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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4 Check D squib (2nd step).

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the steering wheel pad (D squib (2nd step)) to

the spiral cable.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for 10

seconds.
(d)Turn the ignitionswitch toON,andwaitat least for 10se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB 1183/22 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB 1183/22maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace steering wheel pad
(D squib (2nd step)).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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5 Check spiral cable.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Disconnect the spiral cable connector from the column

wire.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D2+

of the black spiral cable connector on the steering wheel
pad (D squib (2nd step)) side.

OK:
Voltage: Below 1 V

NG Replace spiral cable.

OK

6 Check column wire.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Disconnect the column wire connector from the dash

wire.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D2+

of the column wire connector on the spiral cable side.
OK:

Voltage: Below 1 V

NG Repair or replace column wire.

OK
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7 Check dash wire.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and D2+

of the dash wire connector on the column wire side.
OK:

Voltage: Below 1 V

NG Repair or replace dash wire.

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.


